Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 5

Physicians' Conflict of Interest Disclosure Act of 1991

63-6-501. Short title.

This part shall be known as the “Physicians' Conflict of Interest Disclosure Act of 1991.”

Acts 1991, ch. 349, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Brief Life of the Gag Clause: Why Anti-Gag Clause Legislation Isn't Enough, 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1999).

63-6-502. Conflict of interest — How addressed.

Physicians are free to enter lawful contractual relationships, including the acquisition of ownership interests in health facilities, equipment or pharmaceuticals, but these can create potential conflicts of interest.

The potential conflict of interest shall be addressed by the following:

The physician has a duty to disclose to the patient or referring colleagues such physician's ownership interest in the facility or therapy at the time of referral and prior to utilization;

The physician shall not exploit the patient in any way, as by inappropriate or unnecessary utilization;

The physician's activities shall be in strict conformity with the law;

The patient shall have free choice either to use the physician's proprietary facility or therapy or to seek the needed medical services elsewhere; and

When a physician's commercial interest conflicts so greatly with the patient's interest as to be incompatible, the physician shall make alternative arrangements for the care of the patient.

The board shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate this section.

Acts 1991, ch. 349, § 1.

63-6-503. Federal law.

Nothing in this part is intended to nor shall it permit any action that is inconsistent with the federal Patient and Program Protection Act of 1987, or other provisions of federal law that prohibits such arrangements as a condition to receipt of federal funds.

Acts 1991, ch. 349, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The act referred to in this section is apparently the Medicare and Medicaid Patient and Program Protection Act of 1987, P.L. 100-93, which amended numerous sections throughout 42 U.S.C.